Utah statutes.
53A-24-303.   Appointment of division director -- Administration.

(1)  The executive director shall appoint the director of DSBVI with the approval of the board.

(2)  The director of DSBVI shall administer the division in accordance with the direction of the executive director, board policies, and applicable state and federal laws and regulations.

